Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1022.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 34 O.S. 2021, Section 2.1, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2.1. The Secretary of State may promulgate rules to


carry out the provisions of this title including, but not limited


to, establishing qualifications for persons authorized to circulate


and secure signatures.


SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-476 TEK 1/16/2025 2:28:12 PM

Req. No. 476 Page 1